src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-wangkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230505: Csilla)

  Verb - ва̄ӈкве: # Verb 'to see, to know' - full paradigm
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Inf: ва̄ӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ва̄гум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ва̄гын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ва̄г
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: ва̄гме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [ва̄гын, ва̄гы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: ва̄гыг
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [ва̄гув, ва̄гӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [ва̄гын, ва̄гы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: ва̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: ва̄глум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: ва̄глын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: ва̄гтэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: ва̄глуме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: [ва̄глын, ва̄глы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: ва̄гтэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: [ва̄глув, ва̄глӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: [ва̄глын, ва̄глы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: ва̄ганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: ва̄гагум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: ва̄гагын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: ва̄гаге
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: ва̄гагме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: [ва̄гагын, ва̄гагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: ва̄гаге̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: [ва̄гагув, ва̄гагӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: [ва̄гагын, ва̄гагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: ва̄гаганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: ва̄ганум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: [ва̄ганын, ва̄ган]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: ва̄ганэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: ва̄ганаме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: [ва̄нанын, ва̄ганы̄н, ва̄ган]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: ва̄ганэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: [ва̄ганув, ва̄ганӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: [ва̄ганын, ва̄ганы̄н, ва̄ган]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: ва̄ганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: ва̄сум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: ва̄сын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: ва̄с
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: ва̄сме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [ва̄сын, ва̄сы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [ва̄сыг, ва̄сы̄г]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [ва̄сув, ва̄сӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [ва̄сын, ва̄сы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: ва̄сыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: ва̄слум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg: ва̄слын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg: ва̄стэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg: ва̄слуме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg: [ва̄слын, ва̄слы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg: ва̄стэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg: [ва̄слув, ва̄слӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg: [ва̄слын, ва̄слы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg: ва̄саныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu: ва̄сагум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu: ва̄сагын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu: ва̄саге
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu: ва̄сагме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu: [ва̄сагын, ва̄сагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu: ва̄саге̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu: [ва̄сагув, ва̄сагӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu: [ва̄сагын, ва̄сагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu: ва̄саганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl: ва̄санум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl: [ва̄са̄нын, ва̄сан]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl: ва̄санэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl: [ва̄санаме̄н, ва̄санаме̄н, ва̄санме̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl: [ва̄санын, ва̄саны̄н, ва̄сан]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl: ва̄санэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl: ва̄санув
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl: [ва̄санын, ва̄саны̄н, ва̄сан]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl: ва̄саныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [ва̄нувум, ва̄нӯвум]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [ва̄нувын, ва̄нӯвын]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: ва̄нув
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: ва̄нуваме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [ва̄нувын, ва̄нувы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [ва̄нувыг, ва̄нувы̄г]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [ва̄нувув, ва̄нувӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [ва̄нувын, ва̄нувы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [ва̄нувыт, ва̄нувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg: ва̄нувлум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg: ва̄нувлын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg: ва̄нувтэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg: ва̄нувламе̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg: [ва̄нувлын, ва̄нувлы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg: ва̄нувтэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg: [ва̄нувлув, ва̄нувлӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg: [ва̄нувлын, ва̄нувлы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg: [ва̄нуваныл, ва̄нува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu: [ва̄нувагум, ва̄нува̄гум]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu: [ва̄нувагын, ва̄нува̄гын]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu: [ва̄нуваге, ва̄нува̄ге]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu: ва̄нувагме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu: [ва̄нувагын, ва̄нувагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu: ва̄нуваге̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu: [ва̄нувагув, ва̄нувагӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu: [ва̄нувагын, ва̄нувагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu: [ва̄нуваганыл, ва̄нувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl: [ва̄нуванум, ва̄нува̄нум]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl: [ва̄нуванын, ва̄нува̄нын]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl: [ва̄нуванэ, ва̄нува̄нэ]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl: ва̄нуванме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl: [ва̄нуванын, ва̄нуваны̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl: ва̄нуванэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl: ва̄нуванув
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl: [ва̄нуванын, ва̄нуваны̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl: [ва̄нуваныл, ва̄нува̄ныл]

#Active, imeperative, subjective conjugation
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: ва̄ен
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [ва̄ен, ва̄е̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [ва̄ен, ва̄е̄н]

#Active, imeperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg: [ва̄елн, ва̄е̄лн]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg: [ва̄е̄лн, ва̄е̄лы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg: [ва̄е̄лн, ва̄е̄лы̄н]

#Active, imeperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu: [ва̄егын, ва̄е̄гн]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu: [ва̄егын, ва̄егы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu: [ва̄егын, ва̄егы̄н]

#Active, imeperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl: [ва̄ен, ва̄е̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl: [ва̄ен, ва̄е̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl: [ва̄ен, ва̄е̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ва̄вем
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ва̄вен
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ва̄ве
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: ва̄веме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [ва̄вен, ва̄ве̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: ва̄ве̄г
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: ва̄ве̄в
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [ва̄вен, ва̄ве̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: ва̄вет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: ва̄йве̄сум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: ва̄йве̄сын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [ва̄йвес, ва̄йве̄с]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: ва̄йвесаме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [ва̄йвесын, ва̄йвесы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: ва̄йвесы̄г
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [ва̄йвесув, ва̄йвесӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [ва̄йвесын, ва̄йвесы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: ва̄йве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [ва̄нувем, ва̄нӯвем]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [ва̄нувен, ва̄нӯвен]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [ва̄нуве, ва̄нӯве]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: ва̄нувеме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [ва̄нувен, ва̄нуве̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [ва̄нувег, ва̄нуве̄г]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: ва̄нуве̄в
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [ва̄нувен, ва̄нуве̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [ва̄нувет, ва̄нӯвет]

#Passive, imeperative conjugation
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+ScSg2: ва̄гвен
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+ScDu2: [ва̄гвен, ва̄гве̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+ScPl2: [ва̄гвен, ва̄гве̄н]

#Present participle
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc: ва̄нэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1: ва̄нэм
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2: ва̄нэн
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3: ва̄нэ̄тэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1: ва̄нэме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2: ва̄нэнэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3: [ва̄нэг, ва̄нэ̄г]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1: ва̄нэ̄в
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2: [ва̄нэн, ва̄нэ̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3: [ва̄нэныл, ва̄нэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, single object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: ва̄нэ̄лум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: [ва̄нэ̄лн, ва̄нэ̄лын]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: ва̄нэ̄тэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: ва̄нэламе̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: ва̄нэлы̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: ва̄нэтэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [ва̄нэлув, ва̄нэлӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: ва̄нэлы̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: [ва̄нэ̄нл, ва̄нэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: ва̄нэ̄гум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: [ва̄нэ̄гн, ва̄нэ̄гын]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: ва̄нэ̄гэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: ва̄нэгаме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: ва̄нэгы̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: ва̄нэгэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [ва̄нэгув, ва̄нэгӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: ва̄нэгагы̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: ва̄нэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: ва̄нэ̄нум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: ва̄нэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: ва̄нэ̄нэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [ва̄нэнаме̄н, ва̄нэнанме̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [ва̄нэны̄н, ва̄нэныны̄н, ва̄нэнаны̄н] 
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [ва̄нэнэ̄н, ва̄нэнанэ̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [ва̄нэнув, ва̄нэнӯв, ва̄нэнанув, ва̄нэнанӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [ва̄нэны̄н, ва̄нэнаны̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [ва̄нэ̄нл, ва̄нэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc: ва̄м
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1: ва̄мум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2: ва̄мын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3: ва̄ме
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1: ва̄маме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2: [ва̄мын, ва̄мы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3: ва̄мыг
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1: [ва̄мув, ва̄мӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2: [ва̄мын, ва̄ммы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3: ва̄мыт

#Past participle, single object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: ва̄млум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: ва̄млын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: ва̄мтэ
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: ва̄мламе̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: ва̄млы̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: ва̄мтэ̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [ва̄млув, ва̄млӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: вамлы̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: ва̄маныл
